Louisiana, session 2026, HB309.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:212(C) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
32:212(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§212. Pedestrians right-of-way in crosswalks
* * *
C.(1) No pedestrian shall operate a wireless telecommunications device, as
defined in R.S. 32:59, in a marked crosswalk in a manner which requires the visual
attention of the pedestrian.
(2) Nothing in this Subsection shall prohibit a person from continuing a call
on a wireless telecommunications device in a manner which does not require his
visual attention for the entire time he is in the marked crosswalk.
(3) The provisions of this Subsection do not apply to a person who uses a
wireless telecommunications device in a crosswalk to do any of the following:
(a) Report a traffic collision, medical emergency, other emergency, or
serious road hazard.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1029 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 309
(b) Report a situation in which the person believes that an individual is in
jeopardy of serious injury or death.
(c) Dial 911 to report a crime in progress.
(d) View a global positioning system for purposes of pedestrian navigation.
(4) Whoever violates the provisions of this Subsection shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and be fined twenty-five dollars.
C.D. Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any
unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway,
the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass
such stopped vehicle.
D.E. Subsection A of this Section shall does not apply where if the
pedestrian is crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead
pedestrian crossing has been provided.